New Mexico, session 2026, SB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Four million dollars ($4,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the Indian affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to create an Indian affairs commission to facilitate communication and consultation between New Mexico Indian nations, tribes and pueblos and the federal government. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233690.1